West Virginia, session 2026, HB4228.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5B. Authorization for OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5B-1. Office of Inspector General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on May 29, 2025, authorized under the authority of §27-9-1 of this code, relating to the Office of Inspector General (behavioral health centers licensure, 71 CSR 25), is authorized with the following amendment:On page 2, by inserting a new subsection 2.7. to read as follows: "2.7. The director shall deem the license of a child placing agency providing behavioral health services within the scope of its license as described in 78CSR02."; And, Renumber the remaining subsections accordingly.